Oklahoma, session 2026, SB892.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-2515, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-2515. A. Notwithstanding any other provision of this


title, Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Regions emergency medical


service (EMS) regions, Ambulance Service ambulance service districts


or, and municipalities are hereby authorized to regulate and


control, pursuant to duly enacted ordinance or regulation, Ambulance


Service ambulance service transports originating within the

Req. No. 1199 Page 1


jurisdiction of such EMS Regions regions, Ambulance Service


ambulance service districts, or municipalities.


B. Any ordinance or regulation adopted pursuant to subsection A


of this section shall meet and may exceed, but shall not be in


contravention of, the standards promulgated by the State Board


Commissioner of Health for Ambulance Service ambulance service


transports.


C. 1. Any ordinance or regulation adopted by an EMS Region,


Ambulance Service district region or a municipality may establish a


sole-provider system for wheelchair, stretcher van and/or Ambulance


Service, or ambulance service transports, or a combination thereof;


provided, however, any such designated or contracted sole-provider


which is not an EMS Region, Ambulance Service district region,


municipality, or other public entity shall be selected by


competitive bidding.


2. A contract entered into pursuant to such bidding shall be


with the lowest and best bidder and may be for an initial term of


such duration as deemed operationally and fiscally prudent by the


contracting agency. The term of such sole-provider contract shall


be made public at the time bids are solicited, which solicitation


shall be not less than sixty (60) days prior to the contract start


date.


D. Any EMS Region, Ambulance Service district region or


municipality may establish a sole-provider system for wheelchair,

Req. No. 1199 Page 2


stretcher van and/or Ambulance Service, or ambulance service


transports, or a combination thereof, and may allow additional


geographic or political subdivisions to join such a system at any


time. Whenever such a geographic or political subdivision joins


such a sole-provider system, competitive bidding shall not be


required and provision for servicing the new jurisdiction may be


accomplished by amending the existing sole-provider contract.


Furthermore, in the event the expansion of the service area of the


EMS Region, Ambulance Service district region or the municipality is


substantial (in the sole opinion of the governing body of the EMS


Region region, Ambulance Service ambulance service district or


municipality), the existing sole-provider contract may be extended


for a period sufficient to allow reasonable opportunity for recovery


of capital costs of expansion, as determined by the contracting


agency.


E. 1. All ambulance service districts shall be sole-provider


systems for all emergency and nonemergency wheelchair, stretcher


van, and ambulance service transports within their geographical


boundaries. No ambulance service provider or other provider of such


transports shall operate within the ambulance service district


without the prior written authorization of the ambulance service


district, and licensure of the provider by the State Department of


Health to provide such transports within the ambulance service



Req. No. 1199 Page 3


district shall be contingent upon obtainment of such prior written


authorization.


2. An ambulance service district may petition the district


court for relief when a provider violates the provisions of


paragraph 1 of this subsection and the court shall award any


appropriate relief including, but not limited to, injunctive relief,


compensatory damages, punitive damages, and reasonable attorney


fees.


F. The provisions of this section shall not be construed or


applied to limit:


1. Limit the operation of any emergency medical service


district established and operating pursuant to Section 9C of Article


X of the Oklahoma Constitution; provided, however, that, upon


invitation and approval of a majority of the voters of the district,


any such district is hereby authorized to join by appropriate


agreement any system established by an EMS Region region, Ambulance


Service ambulance service district, or a municipality pursuant to


the provisions of this section; or


2. Prohibit a hospital, medical facility, or long-term care


facility from entering into a contract with an ambulance service


district to provide transports within the ambulance service district


as stipulated in the contract and subject to the prior written


authorization required by subsection E of this section.



Req. No. 1199 Page 4


F. G. The following types of patient transports shall be exempt


from regulation by EMS Regions regions, Ambulance Service ambulance


service districts, or municipalities:


1. Any ambulance owned or operated by, or under contract to


perform ambulance transport services for, the Federal federal or


State state government, or any agency thereof;


2. Any ambulance owned and operated by a hospital and in use to


transport a patient of the owner-hospital, which patient has been


admitted to and not been discharged from the owner-hospital, to or


from another hospital or medical care facility at which the patient


receives a diagnostic or therapeutic procedure not available at the


owner-hospital, provided that the patient is not discharged from the


care of the owner-hospital at any point during transport or while


the patient is at the other hospital or medical facility;


3. Any ambulance engaged in a routine transport call to


transport a patient from a hospital, nursing home, or dialysis


center located within an EMS Region, Ambulance Service district or


municipality to any location outside the EMS Region, Ambulance


Service district or municipality;


4. Any ambulance engaged in the transport of a patient from a


location outside an EMS Region region, Ambulance Service ambulance


service district, or municipality to a location inside an EMS Region


region, Ambulance Service ambulance service district, or


municipality; or

Req. No. 1199 Page 5


5. 4. Any ambulance engaged in the interstate transport of a


patient.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1199 DC 1/19/2025 5:45:24 AM







































Req. No. 1199 Page 6